src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Meadow Mari verb inflection.
!  ===========================


! =============================== !
!! !!!Verbal continuation lexica
! =============================== !

!! !!Auxiliary verbs 

!! Some of these are directed directly from root.lexc

LEXICON verbs_not_from_xml   !!=   @CODE@ 
ок+V+Neg: negverb ;
улаш+V: ulasj ;

LEXICON negverb !!= @CODE@ TODO: fix
+Prs+Sg1:ом K ;
+Prs+Sg2:от K ;
+Prs+Sg3:ок K ;
+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:огеш K ;
+Prs+Pl1:она K ;
+Prs+Pl1+Use/NG:огына K ;
+Prs+Pl2:ода K ;
+Prs+Pl2+Use/NG:огыда K ;
+Prs+Pl3:огыт K ;
+Prt1+Sg1:шым K ;
+Prt1+Sg2:шыч K ;
+Prt1+Sg3:ыш K ;
+Prt1+Pl1:ышна K ;
+Prt1+Pl2:ышта K ;
+Prt1+Pl3:ышт K ;
+Prt2+Sg1:омыл K ;
+Prt2+Sg2:отыл K ;
+Prt2+Sg3:огыл K ;
+Prt2+Pl1:онал K ;
+Prt2+Pl2:одал K ;
+Prt2+Pl3:огытыл K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:ит K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:ида K ;

LEXICON ulasj
+Inf:улаш K ;
+Prs+Sg1:улам K ;
+Prs+Sg2:улат K ;
+Prs+Sg3:улеш K ;
+Prs+Pl1:улына K ;
+Prs+Pl2:улыда K ;
+Prs+Pl3:улыт K ;
+Prt1+Sg1:ылым K ;
+Prt1+Sg2:ылыч K ;
+Prt1+Sg3:ыле K ;
+Prt1+Pl1:ыльна K ;
+Prt1+Pl2:ыльда K ;
+Prt1+Pl3:ылыч K ;
+Prt2+Sg1:улынам K ;
+Prt2+Sg2:улынат K ;
+Prt2+Sg3:улмаш K ;
+Prt2+Sg3+Use/NG:улмашын K ;
+Prt2+Pl1:улынна K ;
+Prt2+Pl2:улында K ;
+Prt2+Pl3:улыныт K ;

!LEXICON V-AUX_  !!= @CODE@ TODO: fix
!+V+Aux: # ;



!! !!Regular verbs

!! We divide the verbs in two, -am and -em

!! !The -am class

LEXICON V_am-N !!= @CODE@ divides V_am in Mood and infinites
 +V+Ger+Gen:%^END K ;
  V_am ;

LEXICON V_am !!= @CODE@ divides V_am in Mood and infinites

              +Der/Caus:ы%>кт V_em; ! Causative derivation: ышташ 'to do' > ыштыкташ 'to make do'
              +Der/Refl:ы%>А2лт V_am; ! Reflexive derivation: ончыкташ 'to show' > ончыкталташ 'to show oneself'
                 +V:      Vam-Mood    ;
             +V+Inf:%>А2ш K           ;

             +V+Inf+Dat:%>А2шлан K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg1:%>А2шем K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg2:%>А2шет K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шыже K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шыж K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шше K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl1:%>А2шна K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl2:%>А2шда K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl3:%>А2шышт K           ;

         +V+Ger+Gen:%>ын  K           ;
                 +V:      non-finites ;
          +V+ConNeg:%^END K ;
       +V+Imprt+Sg2:%^END K-imprt     ;

LEXICON Vam-Mood !!= @CODE@ divides in Ind, Imprt, Des
   +Ind: Vam-Ind ;
 +Imprt: Vam-Imp ;
   +Des: Vam-Des ;

LEXICON Vam-Ind !!= @CODE@ gives all the Ind tenses
  +Prs+Sg1:%>А2м  K ;
  +Prs+Sg2:%>А2т  K ;
  +Prs+Sg3:%>Е2ш   K ;
  +Prs+Pl1:%>ына  K ;
  +Prs+Pl2:%>ыда  K ;
  +Prs+Pl3:%>ыт   K ;
! Первое прошедшее время:
    +Prt1+Sg1:%>%{ьØ%}ым   K ;
    +Prt1+Sg2:%>%{ьØ%}ыч   K ;
    +Prt1+Sg3:%>%{ьØ%}Ы2   K ;
    +Prt1+Pl1:%>на   K ;
    +Prt1+Pl2:%>да   K ;
    +Prt1+Pl3:%>%{ьØ%}ыч   K ;
! Второе прошедшее время:
    +Prt2+Sg1:%>ынам K ;
    +Prt2+Sg2:%>ынат K ;
    +Prt2+Sg3:%>ын   K ;
    +Prt2+Pl1:%>ынна K ;
    +Prt2+Pl2:%>ында K ;
    +Prt2+Pl3:%>ыныт K ;

LEXICON Vam-Imp  !!= @CODE@ for imperative, Повелительное наклонение:
 +Sg3:%>жЫ2 K       ;
 +Pl2:%>за  K-imprt ;
 +Pl3:%>ышт K       ;

LEXICON Vam-Des  !!= @CODE@ for desiderative, Желательное наклонение:
 +Prs+Sg1:%>нем  K ;
 +Prs+Sg2:%>нет  K ;
 +Prs+Sg3:%>неже K ;
 +Prs+Pl1:%>нена K ;
 +Prs+Pl2:%>неда K ;
 +Prs+Pl3:%>нешт K ;


!! !The -em class

LEXICON V_em !!= @CODE@ divides V_em in Mood and infinites

  V_em-1SYLL ; 
           +V+Ger+Gen:  K ; !CHECKME is %>Ы2%^END required

LEXICON V_em-1SYLL-j !!= @CODE@ These allow for literary norm until 1970s (see Alhoniemi 1985: 105-106) кайше, кайшаш
+V+Err/Orth: non-finites ; !!= @CODE@ until 1972 reform
V_em-1SYLL ;

LEXICON V_em-1SYLL !!= @CODE@ These are single syllable V_em verbs, which do not include bare-stem gerunds in their paradigms

              +Der/Caus:ы%>кт V_em; ! Causative derivation: ышташ 'to do' > ыштыкташ 'to make do'
              +Der/Refl:%>А2лт V_am; ! Reflexive derivation: ончыкташ 'to show' > ончыкталташ 'to show oneself'

                 +V:      Vem-Mood    ;
             +V+Inf:%>А2ш K           ;


             +V+Inf+Dat:%>А2шлан K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg1:%>А2шем K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg2:%>А2шет K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шыже K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шыж K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxSg3:%>А2шше K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl1:%>А2шна K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl2:%>А2шда K           ;
             +V+Inf+PxPl3:%>А2шышт K           ;


! Деепричастие образа действия:
         +V+Ger+Gen:%>Е2н  K           ;
                 +V:ы     non-finites ;
          +V+ConNeg:%>Ы2%^END  K           ; ! 
       +V+Imprt+Sg2:%>Ы2%^END  K-imprt     ;

          +V+ConNeg:%>%^V2IMPRT  K           ; ! Only single-syllables in й
       +V+Imprt+Sg2:%>%^V2IMPRT K-imprt     ; !

LEXICON Vem-Mood !!= @CODE@ divides in Ind, Imprt, Des
    +Ind: Vem-Ind ;
  +Imprt: Vem-Imp ;
    +Des: Vem-Des ;

LEXICON Vem-Ind  !!= @CODE@ gives all the Ind tenses
  +Prs+Sg1:%>Е2м   K ;
  +Prs+Sg2:%>Е2т   K ;
  +Prs+Sg3:%>А2    K ;
  +Prs+Pl1:%>Е2на  K ;
  +Prs+Pl2:%>Е2да  K ;
  +Prs+Pl3:%>А2т   K ;
! Первое прошедшее время:
    +Prt1+Sg1:%>ышым K ;
    +Prt1+Sg2:%>ышыч K ;
    +Prt1+Sg3:%>ыш   K ;
    +Prt1+Pl1:%>ышна K ;
    +Prt1+Pl2:%>ышда K ;
    +Prt1+Pl3:%>ышт  K ;
! Второе прошедшее время:
    +Prt2+Sg1:%>Е2нам K ;
    +Prt2+Sg2:%>Е2нат K ;
    +Prt2+Sg3:%>Е2н   K ;
    +Prt2+Pl1:%>Е2нна K ;
    +Prt2+Pl2:%>Е2нда K ;
    +Prt2+Pl3:%>Е2ныт K ;

LEXICON Vem-Imp !!= * @CODE@ for imperative, Повелительное наклонение:
 +Sg3:ы%>жЫ2 K       ; ! Note position of boundary break, between ы and жЫ2
 +Pl2:%>ыза  K-imprt ;
 +Pl3:%>ышт  K       ;

LEXICON Vem-Des !!= * @CODE@ for desiderative, Желательное наклонение:
 +Prs+Sg1:%>ынем  K ;
 +Prs+Sg2:%>ынет  K ;
 +Prs+Sg3:%>ынеже K ;
 +Prs+Pl1:%>ынена K ;
 +Prs+Pl2:%>ынеда K ;
 +Prs+Pl3:%>ынешт K ;
