src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
алтыкташ:алтыкт V_em  "" ;
аруэмаш:аруэм V_am  "" ;
ашыкташ:ашыкт V_em  "" ;
аяш+Hom1:ай V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
аяш+Hom2:ай V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
вакаш:вак V_em-1SYLL  "ponnistää; vetää (väkisin); oksentaa" ;
васарыктылаш:васарыктыл V_am  "" ;
вашемдаш:вашемд V_em  "" ;
веселаҥаш:веселаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
виешташ:виешт V_am  "" ;
витньызыланаш:витньызылан V_em  "" ;
вияш:вий V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
волгалтарылаш:волгалтарыл V_am  "" ;
волгыжташ:волгыжт V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
вораҥаш:вораҥ V_am-N  "" ;
вурсаҥдаш:вурсаҥд V_em  "hitsata" ;
вуяҥаш:вуяҥ V_am-N  "" ;
вырлаш:вырл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
гримироватлалташ:гримироватлалт V_am  "" ;
гӱжланалташ:гӱжланалт V_em  "" ;
ешаҥаш:ешаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
заказышташ:заказышт V_em  "" ;
инаш:ин V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
интересоватлаш:интересоватл V_em  "kiinnostaa" ;
йолаҥаш:йолаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
йомдараш:йомдар V_em-1SYLL  "kadottaa; tuhota; jättää" ;
йончешташ:йончешт V_am  "" ;
йоҥгештараш:йоҥгештар V_em  "vapauttaa" ;
йымыжаҥаш:йымыжаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
йытыгаш:йытыг V_em  "" ;
йычкаш:йычк V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
йӧсалташ:йӧсалт V_am  "" ;
йӱлаш:йӱл V_em  "palaa; (uuni) lämmitä" ;
йӱэдаш:йӱэд V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
калыкаҥаш:калыкаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
капкалаш:капкал V_em  "keräytyä" ;
каталташ:каталт V_am  "" ;
каяш:кай V_em-1SYLL-j  "mennä, lähteä; kulkea" ;
кемыктараш:кемыктар V_em  "" ;
кертежаҥаш:кертежаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
кияш:кий V_em-1SYLL-j  "maata" ;
ковыраҥаш:ковыраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
когыльташ:когыльт V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
койылдалаш:койылдал V_am  "" ;
коктеланаш:коктелан V_em  "empiä" ;
комаҥаш:комаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
комдышлаш:комдышл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
корштарыкташ:корштарыкт V_em  "" ;
котьланаш:котьлан V_em-1SYLL  "(leipä) kuivettua" ;
кояш:кой V_am  "näyttää, tuntua, näkyä" ;
кояҥаш:кояҥ V_am-N  "" ;
кулланаш:куллан V_em  "" ;
культураҥаш:культураҥ V_am-N  "" ;
курыкмарлаҥаш:курыкмарлаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
курыктылаш:курыктыл V_am  "" ;
кутыраш:кутыр V_em  "puhua, jutella; kehua" ;
кушташ+Hom1:кушт V_em-1SYLL  "tanssia" ;
куяш:куй V_em-1SYLL-j  "kutoa" ;
куяш:куй V_em-1SYLL-j  "lapioida; soutaa" ;
кычалыкташ:кычалыкт V_em  "" ;
кӧргаҥаш:кӧргаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
кӱаш:кӱ V_am  "kypsyä; päivettyä" ;
кӱнчыкташ:кӱнчыкт V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
лайгаҥаш:лайгаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
лачемаш:лачем V_am  "" ;
лаштыраҥаш:лаштыраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
логалтараш:логалтар V_em  "" ;
лончедаш:лончед V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
лоптыраҥаш:лоптыраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
лупшалташ:лупшалт V_am  "" ;
лыгаҥаш:лыгаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
лӧчкаш:лӧчк V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
лӱммутаҥаш:лӱммутаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
лӱяш:лӱй V_em-1SYLL-j  "ampua" ;
магыркалаш:магыркал V_em  "" ;
мекшаҥаш:мекшаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
мияш:мий V_em-1SYLL-j  "mennä, tulla" ;
модылдалаш:модылдал V_am  "" ;
муржаҥаш:муржаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
мушлаш:мушл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
мызийланаш:мызийлан V_em  "" ;
наказатлалташ:наказатлалт V_am  "" ;
нарынчаҥаш:нарынчаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
нояш:ной V_em-1SYLL-j  "väsyä, menehtyä" ;
ньыкешташ:ньыкешт V_am  "" ;
нямлаш:нямл V_em  "" ;
нӧраш:нӧр V_em-1SYLL  "kastua" ;
ойырлаш:ойырл V_em-1SYLL  "erota" ;
ола-вулаҥаш:ола•-вулаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
ончедылаш:ончедыл V_am  "" ;
орланаш:орлан V_em-1SYLL  "kiusaantua; kärsiä; uupua" ;
ояш+Hom1:ой V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
ояш+Hom2:ой V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
палыланаш:палылан V_em  "selvitä, muodostua; olla havaittavissa" ;
пальткаҥаш:пальткаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
паремдалташ:паремдалт V_am  "" ;
першаш:перш V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
пичешталташ:пичешталт V_am  "" ;
пондашаҥаш:пондашаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
порволташ:порволт V_em  "" ;
порсынлаш:порсынл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
пояш:пой V_em-1SYLL-j  "rikastua" ;
преяш:прей V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
пудыргылаш:пудыргыл V_am  "" ;
пулчаш:пулч V_em-1SYLL  "pukea ja käyttää Sarpan- ja naSmak-päähinettä S" ;
пустаҥаш:пустаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
пучыртаташ:пучыртат V_em  "" ;
пыдалаш:пыдал V_am  "" ;
пӧлаш:пӧл V_em-1SYLL  "jakaa (asunto)" ;
пӱрнылаш:пӱрныл V_am  "" ;
пӱяш:пӱй V_em-1SYLL-j  "padota" ;
ракатланаш:ракатлан V_em  "nauttia" ;
резаҥаш:резаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
рождараш:рождар V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
руалалташ:руалалт V_am  "" ;
рыяш:рый V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
саваш:сав V_em-1SYLL  "puida; nyökätä, kumartaa; iskeä tulta" ;
савырташ:савырт V_em  "" ;
садераҥаш:садераҥ V_am-N  "" ;
сдаяш:сдай V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
сералташ:сералт V_am  "" ;
сонарлаш:сонарл V_em-1SYLL  "metsästää" ;
стимулироватлаш:стимулироватл V_em  "" ;
суасаҥаш:суасаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
сӧралташ:сӧралт V_am  "" ;
сӱвызлаш:сӱвызл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
талякаҥаш:талякаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
танатарланаш:танатарлан V_em  "" ;
таяш:тай V_em-1SYLL-j  "kallistaa, painaa (alas)" ;
тидаш:тид V_em-1SYLL  "ripottaa, karistaa" ;
тияш:тий V_am  "" ;
тормозитлаш:тормозитл V_em-1SYLL  "jarruttaa" ;
тотаҥаш:тотаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
тояш:той V_em-1SYLL-j  "kätkeä; salata; haudata" ;
туныкташ:туныкт V_em  "opettaa" ;
тургыжаш+Hom1:тургыж V_am  "" ;
тӧршташ:тӧршт V_em-1SYLL  "hypätä, hypähtää; syöksyä" ;
тӱкылалташ:тӱкылалт V_am  "sulkeutua, mennä lukkoon" ;
тӱлаҥаш:тӱлаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
тӱлыртараш:тӱлыртар V_em  "" ;
тӱркаҥдаш:тӱркаҥд V_em-1SYLL  "pörröttää (tukkaa)" ;
тӱяш:тӱй V_em-1SYLL-j  "pilkkoa" ;
ураш:ур V_em-1SYLL  "kaivaa, haudata; mullata" ;
ургыштылаш:ургыштыл V_am  "" ;
ушаҥдараш:ушаҥдар V_em  "" ;
чагыраҥаш:чагыраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
чеплалташ:чеплалт V_am  "" ;
чеслаш+Hom2:чесл V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
чияш:чий V_em-1SYLL-j  "pukea, pukeutua" ;
чокаяш:чокай V_em  "" ;
чоҥешташ:чоҥешт V_em-1SYLL  "lentää" ;
чуякаҥаш:чуякаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
чуяш:чуй V_em-1SYLL-j  "(puhek.) imarrella" ;
чыпчалташ:чыпчалт V_am  "" ;
чӱчаш+Hom2:чӱч V_em  "" ;
чӱчыкташ:чӱчыкт V_em-1SYLL  "tiputtaa" ;
шергылтаралташ:шергылтаралт V_am  "" ;
шолыштыкташ:шолыштыкт V_em  "" ;
шораҥаш:шораҥ V_am-N  "" ;
шоҥалташ:шоҥалт V_am  "" ;
шрӧпкаш:шрӧпк V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
шуэшташ:шуэшт V_am  "" ;
шуяш:шуй V_em-1SYLL-j  "heittää, hylätä" ;
шымаҥаш:шымаҥ V_am-N  "" ;
шындылыкташ:шындылыкт V_em  "" ;
шӱкалалташ:шӱкалалт V_am  "" ;
шӱраҥаш:шӱраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
шӱчаҥдаш:шӱчаҥд V_em-1SYLL  "hiillyttää; noeta" ;
шӱяш+Hom2:шӱй V_em-1SYLL-j  "" ;
эмганаш:эмган V_em  "loukata itsensä, vammautua" ;
эрыкталташ:эрыкталт V_am  "" ;
яраҥаш:яраҥ V_am-N  "" ;
яҥгаргаш:яҥгарг V_em-1SYLL  "" ;
ӧрдыжташ:ӧрдыжт V_em  "kallistaa" ;
ӱлыкшемаш:ӱлыкшем V_am  "" ;
